Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-163
Boards; members; term.

(1) The members of each board shall be appointed for terms of five years except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act. No member shall be appointed for or serve for more than two consecutive full five-year terms except as otherwise specifically provided in the act.

(2) The term of each member shall commence on the first day of December following the expiration of the term of the member whom such person succeeds except as otherwise provided in the act.

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 8, p. 541;

R.S.1943, § 71-116;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 10, p. 1079;

Laws 1963, c. 408, § 5, p. 1311;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 4;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 297, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 428, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 34;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 26;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 110;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-116;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 63.